es: Botón de control del volante compatible: Compatible (conserva los botones del fabricante original); Incluye botones nuevos; No compatible (sin provisiones para botones); Requiere adaptador/arnés adicional; Otro
zh-CN: 适配方向盘控制按钮: 兼容（保留原厂按钮）; 包含新按钮; 不兼容（无按钮配置）; 需要额外的适配器/线束; 其他
en: Compatible steering wheel control button: Compatible (retains OEM buttons); Includes new buttons; Not compatible (no button provisions); Requires additional adapter/harness; Other
cs: Kompatibilní tlačítko pro ovládání na volantu: Kompatibilní (zachovává OEM tlačítka); Obsahuje nová tlačítka; Není kompatibilní (bez tlačítek); Vyžaduje dodatečný adaptér/kabeláž; Jiné
ko: 호환 스티어링 휠 제어 버튼: 호환(OEM 버튼 유지); 새 버튼 포함; 호환되지 않음(버튼 미제공); 추가 어댑터/하네스 필요; 기타
nb: Kompatibel rattkontrollknapp: Kompatibel (beholder OEM-knapper); Inkluderer nye knapper; Ikke kompatibel (ingen knappeuttak); Krever ekstra adapter/kabelmatte; Annet
sl-SI: Združljiv gumb za upravljanje na volanu: Združljivo (ohranja originalne gumbe); Vključuje nove gumbe; Ni združljivo (ni pogojev za gumbe); Zahteva dodaten adapter/kabelski snop; Drugo
bg-BG: Съвместим бутон за управление на волана: Съвместим (запазва OEM бутоните); Включва нови бутони; Несъвместим (без възможност за бутони); Изисква допълнителен адаптер/кабелен сноп; Друг
zh-TW: 相容方向盤控制按鈕: 相容 (保留 OEM 按鈕); 包含新按鈕; 不相容 (未提供按鈕配置); 需要額外轉接器/線束; 其他
lt-LT: Suderinamas vairo valdymo mygtukas: Suderinama (išlaiko originalius mygtukus); Yra nauji mygtukai; Nesuderinama (nėra numatyta vietos mygtukams); Reikalingas papildomas adapteris / laidai; Kita
da: Kompatibel ratbetjeningsknap: Kompatibel (beholder OEM-knapper); Inkluderer nye knapper; Ikke-kompatibel (ingen knapfunktioner); Kræver ekstra adapter/ledningsnet; Andet
pl: Kompatybilny przycisk sterowania na kierownicy: Kompatybilne (zachowuje przyciski OEM); Zawiera nowe przyciski; Niekompatybilne (brak miejsc na przyciski); Wymaga dodatkowego adaptera/wiązki; Inne
pt-BR: Botão de controle do volante compatível: Compatível (mantém os botões originais); Inclui novos botões; Não compatível (sem espaço para botões); Requer adaptador/chicote elétrico adicional; Outro
fr: Bouton de commande au volant compatible: Compatible (conserve les boutons d’origine); Comprend de nouveaux boutons; Non compatible (aucun emplacement pour boutons); Nécessite un adaptateur/faisceau supplémentaire; Autre
sk-SK: Kompatibilné ovládacie tlačidlo na volante: Kompatibilné (zachováva OEM tlačidlá); Obsahuje nové tlačidlá; Nekompatibilné (bez prípravy na tlačidlá); Vyžaduje dodatočný adaptér/káblový zväzok; Iné
fi: Yhteensopiva ohjauspyörän ohjauspainike: Yhteensopiva (säilyttää OEM-painikkeet); Sisältää uudet painikkeet; Ei yhteensopiva (ei painikevalmiuksia); Vaatii erillisen sovittimen/johtosarjan; Muu
hr-HR: Kompatibilne tipke za upravljanje na volanu: Kompatibilno (zadržava originalne gumbe); Uključuje nove gumbe; Nije kompatibilno (nema mjesta za gumbe); Zahtijeva dodatni adapter/kabel; Ostalo
el: Συμβατό κουμπί ελέγχου τιμονιού: Συμβατό (διατηρεί τα κουμπιά OEM); Περιλαμβάνει νέα κουμπιά; Μη συμβατό (δεν υποστηρίζει κουμπιά); Απαιτείται πρόσθετος προσαρμογέας/πλεξούδα; Άλλο
vi: Nút điều khiển vô lăng tương thích: Tương thích (giữ nguyên nút nguyên bản); Bao gồm nút mới; Không tương thích (không hỗ trợ nút); Yêu cầu bộ chuyển đổi/bộ dây điện bổ sung; Khác
th: ปุ่มควบคุมพวงมาลัยที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: รองรับ (ใช้ปุ่ม OEM เดิมได้); มีปุ่มใหม่มาให้; ไม่รองรับ (ไม่มีช่องใส่ปุ่ม); ต้องใช้อะแดปเตอร์/สายไฟเพิ่มเติม; อื่นๆ
sv: Kompatibel rattkontrollknapp: Kompatibel (behåller OEM-knappar); Inkluderar nya knappar; Ej kompatibel (inga knappförberedelser); Kräver extra adapter/kablage; Övrigt
ru: Совместимая кнопка управления на рулевом колесе: Совместимо (сохраняет штатные кнопки); Включает новые кнопки; Несовместимо (нет разъемов для кнопок); Требуется дополнительный адаптер/кабель; Другое
hu: Kompatibilis kormánykerék-vezérlőgomb: Kompatibilis (megtartja a gyári gombokat); Új gombokat tartalmaz; Nem kompatibilis (nincs kialakítás a gombokhoz); További adaptert/kábelköteget igényel; Egyéb
it: Comando al volante compatibile: Compatibile (mantiene i pulsanti OEM); Include nuovi pulsanti; Non compatibile (nessuna predisposizione per pulsanti); Richiede adattatore/cablaggio aggiuntivo; Altro
ro-RO: Buton de control al volanului compatibil: Compatibil (păstrează butoanele OEM); Include butoane noi; Incompatibil (fără prevederi pentru butoane); Necesită adaptor/cablaj suplimentar; Altele
tr: Uyumlu direksiyon kumanda düğmesi: Uyumlu (OEM düğmeleri korunur); Yeni düğmeler içerir; Uyumlu değil (düğme yeri yok); Ek adaptör/kablo demeti gerektirir; Diğer
de: Kompatibler Lenkrad-Bedienknopf: Kompatibel (behält OEM-Tasten); Inklusive neuer Tasten; Nicht kompatibel (keine Tasten vorgesehen); Benötigt zusätzlichen Adapter/Kabelbaum; Sonstige
pt-PT: Botão de controlo do volante compatível: Compatível (mantém os botões originais); Inclui botões novos; Não compatível (sem provisões para botões); Requer adaptador/cablagem adicional; Outro
nl: Compatibele stuurbedieningsknop: Compatibel (behoudt OEM-knoppen); Inclusief nieuwe knoppen; Niet compatibel (geen knopvoorzieningen); Vereist extra adapter/kabelboom; Overige
ja: 互換性のあるステアリングホイールコントロールボタン: 対応 (純正ボタンを維持); 新規ボタン付属; 非対応 (ボタン機能なし); 追加アダプター/ハーネスが必要; その他